Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2375
Local hospital district; deposit; limitation on amount; excess deposit; security required.

The secretary-treasurer shall not have on deposit in any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution at any time more money than the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, plus the maximum amount of the bond given by such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution in cases when the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution gives a guaranty bond, except as provided in section 77-2376. The amount on deposit at any time with any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall not exceed fifty percent of the capital and surplus of such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, except as provided in section 77-2376. When the amount of money which the secretary-treasurer desires to deposit in the banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions within the district exceeds fifty percent of the capital and surplus of all of the banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions in such local hospital district, the secretary-treasurer may, with the consent of the board of directors, deposit an amount in excess thereof, but not exceeding the capital and surplus in any one bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, unless the depository gives security as provided in section 77-2376. Bond shall be required of all banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions for such excess deposit, unless security is given in accordance with section 77-2376. The bonds shall be deposited with the secretary-treasurer and approved by the board of directors. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1994, LB 1118, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 53;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 75;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 24.
March 6, 2009